Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 1 General Provisions

Administrative rules and regulations.

Seed Division, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Agriculture, Chapter 40-12.

2-11-1.
Misrepresentation of count or variety of agricultural plants.

As used in this Code section, the term “plant” includes tobacco, tomato, cabbage, onion, pepper, and other agricultural plants. Any person who knowingly misrepresents the count or variety of any such plant shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 220, § 1.

2-11-2.
Fraudulent sale of nursery stock or seedlings; misrepresenting fruit or nut trees.

Any person who deceives or defrauds any person in the sale of nursery stock by substituting stock other than that contracted for or different varieties of seedlings than those represented or contracted for or who falsely represents the name, class, description, or condition of any nursery stock or who makes any false statement or promise for the purpose of making a sale of nursery stock shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person, acting either as principal or agent, who sells any fruit or nut trees representing the same to be of a certain kind, variety, or description and thereafter delivers to the purchaser, in filling such order and completing such sale, any fruit or nut trees of a different kind, variety, or description shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1960, p. 255, §§ 2, 3.